Arkansas, session 2025, HB1008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-77-154. Extension of one year for postpartum coverage.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Extend postpartum Medicaid coverage for mothers to one (1)
year in duration; and
(2) Take necessary action, including without limitation
submitting and applying for a state plan amendment or waiver, to obtain
federal approval to adopt one-year postpartum Medicaid coverage for mothers
who have recently given birth.
(b) The department shall promulgate rules to administer this section.

/s/A. Collins


*JMB072*
01-23-2025 10:10:03 JMB072